Utah statutes.
75-3-409.   Formal testacy proceedings -- Order -- Foreign will.
After the time required for any notice has expired, upon proof of notice, and
after any hearing that may be necessary, if the court finds that the testator
is dead, venue is proper and that the proceeding was commenced within the
limitation prescribed by Section 75-3-107, it shall determine the decedent's
domicile at death, his heirs, and his state of testacy. Any will found to be
valid and unrevoked shall be formally probated. Termination of any previous
informal appointment of a personal representative, which may be appropriate in
view of the relief requested and findings, is governed by Section 75-3-612.
The petition shall be dismissed or appropriate amendment allowed if the court
is not satisfied that the alleged decedent is dead. A will from a place which
does not provide for probate of a will after death may be proved for probate
in this state by a duly authenticated certificate of its legal custodian that
the copy introduced is a true copy and that the will has become effective
under the law of the other place.
